New Mexico, session 2026, HB118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of the Public School Code is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] BILITERACY DEVELOPMENT AND TRAINING PROJECT--REQUIREMENTS--DEPARTMENT DUTIES.-- A. As used in this section: (1) "at-risk students" means public school students who are economically disadvantaged, English language learners, Native American or students with disabilities; (2) "biliteracy" means the ability to proficiently read and write in two languages; (3) "multiliteracy" means an approach to teaching reading and writing that integrates other modes of communication, including visual, auditory or gestural modes communication; (4) "project" means the biliteracy development and training project; and (5) "transliteracy" means an instructional concept concerned with a person's ability to communicate and discern meaning across multiple languages, modes of communication and platforms for communication. B. The "biliteracy development and training project" is created as a three-year pilot project to demonstrate that specialized biliteracy training and professional development for teachers will improve educational outcomes for at-risk students. C. The project includes the creation of regional and statewide programs to provide teachers with uniform training in biliteracy instruction and state laws and rules regarding bilingual multicultural education. The training in biliteracy instruction shall be comprehensive and research-based and include best practices for: (1) instruction in a language other than English; (2) developing second language literacy for English language learners; (3) developing biliteracy; and (4) developing transliteracy and multiliteracy across content areas. D. The programs created for the project may be administered by a private provider. If the department contracts with a private provider to administer a program, the provider shall be qualified and, to the department's satisfaction, have: (1) expertise in biliteracy development and bilingual multicultural education; (2) a history of supporting bilingual or multilingual programs in New Mexico; (3) experience in providing professional development to culturally and linguistically different students; (4) capacity to work regionally or statewide; and (5) established relationships with school districts, Indian nations, tribes and pueblos or multilingual communities. E. For participation in the project, the department shall select one hundred twenty-five teachers for the first year, two hundred fifty teachers for the second year and five hundred teachers for the third year. In selecting participants, the department shall prioritize: (1) teachers from school districts with a significant enrollment of bilingual learners; (2) site administrators with experience in managing bilingual multicultural education programs or similar instruction models; and (3) teachers working in bilingual multicultural education programs or similar instruction models. F. The department shall: (1) develop standards for the regional and statewide training programs, criteria for participation and metrics for measuring the effectiveness of the programs in collaboration with a New Mexico-based nonprofit organization that works with schools and teachers to develop and support high-quality bilingual education; and (2) provide a preliminary report and interim reports to the legislative education study committee and a final report to the governor and the legislature that includes data regarding: (a) student biliteracy development; (b) overall educational outcomes for at-risk students; (c) teacher professional development, credential attainment and retention; and (d) parental satisfaction." SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION.--Six million six hundred forty-five thousand dollars ($6,645,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the public education department for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 through 2029 to administer the biliteracy development and training project. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2029 shall revert to the general fund. - 5 -